Hawaii statutes.
§92-29 Reproduction of government records.
Any public officer having the care and custody of any record, paper, or
document may cause the same to be photographed, microphotographed, reproduced
on film, or copied to an electronic format. Any device or electronic storage
system used to copy or reproduce the record, paper, or document shall
accurately reflect the information in the original thereof in all details. [L
1945, c 26, pt of §1; RL 1955, §7-5; HRS §92-29; am L 1991, c 145, §2; am L
2005, c 177, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next